Utah statutes.
26-39-201.   Child Care Licensing Advisory Committee.

(1) (a)  There is established the Child Care Licensing Advisory Committee to advise the department on rules made by the department under this chapter.

(b)  The committee shall be composed of the following 13 members who shall be appointed by the executive director:

(i)  two child care consumers;

(ii)  two licensed residential child care providers;

(iii)  one certified residential child care provider;

(iv)  five representatives of licensed child care center programs;

(v)  one individual with expertise in early childhood development; and

(vi)  two health care providers.

(2)  Members shall be appointed for four-year terms, except for those members who have been appointed to complete an unexpired term.  Appointments and reappointments may be staggered so that 1/4 of the committee changes each year.  The committee shall annually elect a chairman from its membership.

(3)  The committee shall meet at least quarterly, or more frequently as determined by the executive director, the chairman, or three or more members of the committee.  Seven members constitute a quorum and a vote of the majority of the members present constitutes an action of the committee.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 111, 2008 General Session

